Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Mines and Wells.

Sec. 34.35.125.
Liens on mines and oil wells.

A person who, at the instance of the owner, performs work in, on, or about a mine, or mining claim, oil, gas, or other well, in opening up, developing, sinking, drilling, drifting, stoping, mucking, stripping, shoveling, mining, hoisting, firing, cooking, teaming, or performs any other class or kind of work necessary or convenient to the development, operation, working, or mining of the claim or well; or who performs work tending to or assisting in the development, extraction, separation, or reduction to a commercial value of the minerals; or who performs work on a water right, ditch, flume, pipe line, tramway, tram, road, or trail, used in connection with the opening up, or to facilitate the opening up, operation, or development of the claim or well, or the extraction of the minerals, has a lien on the mine or mining claim, oil, gas, or other claim or well as security for the payment of the work.

History.

(§ 26-2-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.130.
Lien on mill or machine.

A person who, at the instance of the owner, performs work or labor on, in, or about a mill or machine, either in the alteration or repair of it, or in the operation or working of it, while the mill or machine is used in or about a mine, or mining claim, oil, gas, or other claim or well, as a means of opening up, developing, or mining, or as a means of separating, extracting, or reducing minerals to commercial value, has a lien on the mill or machine, to secure the payment of the amount due for the work.

History.

(§ 26-2-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.135.
Priority.

A lien under AS

34.35.125

and

34.35.130

is a preferred lien, prior and superior to a mortgage, conditional sale agreement, attachment, claim, or demand, unless the mortgage, conditional sale agreement, attachment, claim, or demand is in writing and recorded in the recorder’s office of the recording district where the property is located before the work for which the lien is claimed is started. A sale, transfer, mortgage, assignment, or attachment made or filed for record after the work is started does not have the effect of postponing the lien.

History.

(§ 26-2-4 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.140.
Lien on dump or mass of mineral.

A person who, at the instance of another who has the right of possession of a mine, or mining claim, oil or gas well, performs upon, in, or about the mine or well any of the kinds of work mentioned in AS

34.35.125

, or who performs any other kind of work in the production, piling up, or storing of a dump or mass of mineral, has a lien on the dump or mass, and the gold, gold dust, or other minerals contained in or extracted from it, to secure the amount due the laborer in the production of the minerals.

The lien attaches to the dump or mass, and to the gold, gold dust, or other mineral, whether they are deposited on the ground in a mass, or dumped into bunkers or hoppers, or stored in tanks or reservoirs, or placed in sluice boxes at the mine, and attaches to the gold, gold dust, and other minerals so long as they are in one mass and can be identified as being produced by the labor of the lienor.

The lien provided for in this section is prior and preferred over a deed, mortgage, bill of sale, attachment, or other claim whether given before or after the work for which the lien is claimed is started.

History.

(§ 26-2-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.145.
Extent of liens.

Liens under AS

34.35.125

,

34.35.130

, and

34.35.140

are security for payment for the work performed within a period of nine months immediately before the cessation of the work.
The liens bind all the right, title, and interest in the property mentioned of the person at whose instance or request or for whom the work is performed, to the full extent of the interest that the person has at the beginning of the work for which the lien is claimed, or subsequently acquired in the property, up to the time of the foreclosure of the lien.

History.

(§ 26-2-6 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.150.
Labor deemed performed at instance of owner, mortgagee, or lien claimant.

When the work mentioned in AS

34.35.125

,

34.35.130

, and

34.35.140

is performed at the instance of a person, who has the right of possession under a written or oral lease, license, or authority, expressed or implied, bond, option or other contract of sale from the owner, executed by the owner’s authority, or who has possession with the knowledge of the owner, the work is considered to have been done at the instance of the owner, and at the instance of the mortgagee or lien claimant.

The owner’s, mortgagee’s, or claimant’s interest in the property is subject to a lien filed in accordance with AS

34.35.125

—

34.35.170

, unless the owner, mortgagee, or claimant, within 10 days after obtaining knowledge of the work, gives notice of nonresponsibility for the work, by posting notices to that effect in three conspicuous places on the mine, mining claim, or on or near the oil, gas, or other well, or in one conspicuous place on the dredge, steam shovel, derrick, mill, or machine. A mortgagee or other lien claimant must also give additional notice of the nature of the lien, the amount due on it, and refer to the volume and page where the claim of lien is recorded.

The posting of notice is not required on a dragline, electric shovel, tractor, scraper, hoist, truck, or mobile equipment or machinery or personal property that is readily moved about from place to place or is required to be moved from place to place in the course of mining operations.

History.

(§ 26-2-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.155.
Liens not exclusive.

Liens under AS

34.35.125

—

34.35.170

are not exclusive of one another. The lien shall attach and may be claimed by the same labor upon the mine, mining claim, mill, or machine used in mining or working, and the dump or mass of mineral, gold, or gold dust, if the facts relative to the labor warrant.

A lienor may claim a lien on one or more of the different classes of property subject to a lien for the same labor if

the amount claimed against each class of property is separately stated;

the property sought to be charged is described so that it can be identified; and

the name of the owner or reputed owner is given.

History.

(§ 26-2-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.160.
Claim of lien.

A person who claims the benefit of AS

34.35.125

—

34.35.170

shall, within 90 days after the performance of the services or the cessation of the work mentioned in AS

34.35.125

—

34.35.170

, record the claim of lien in the recorder’s office of the recording district in which the mine or mining claim, or other property on which the lien is claimed is located or used.

The claim of lien must contain

a statement of the demand;

the amount of the demand, after deducting all credits and offsets;

the name of the person by whom the claimant was employed;

a statement of the terms and conditions of the contract of employment;

the date of starting and stopping the work;

a description of the property on which the lien is claimed, sufficient for identification; and

the name of the owner or reputed owner.

The lien claim shall be verified by the oath of the lien claimant or someone on behalf of the lien claimant having personal knowledge of the facts. If there is no express contract of employment, the claim must state the reasonable value of the work and services.

History.

(§ 26-2-9 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.165.
Duration of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.125

—

34.35.170

does not bind a property for more than six months after notice of the lien is filed for record, unless suit is brought before the proper court to enforce the lien within that time, or if credit is given, with six months after the expiration of the credit.

A lien may not be continued in force for more than one year from the stopping of work by an agreement to give credit.

History.

(§ 26-2-10 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.170.
Definitions.

In AS

34.35.125

—

34.35.170

,

“dump” or “mass” means the mineral-bearing sands, gravel, earth, ore, stone, coal, oil, gas, other fluids or minerals extracted, hoisted, and raised from a mine or mining claim, while in mass at the mine or on the mining claim or adjacent to it, whether it is deposited in dumps or piles, or placed in hoppers, tanks, or reservoirs, or in sluice boxes or bunkers or other receptacles and whether partially or wholly reduced from its primary state or not;

“mill” or “machine” includes a dredge, steam, internal combustion or electric shovel, dragline, tractor, scraper, hoist, engine and boiler, derrick, drill, roasting or reduction works, stamp, roller or other mill, concentrator, conveyor, elevator, or other machinery used in or about a mine in digging, hoisting, conveying, washing, or blocking out mineral contents, or reducing the mineral contents to a commercial value, while the mill or machine is used in connection with the operation of the mine, and is not a fixture and included in the term “mine” as defined in this section;

“mine” or “mining claim” means a block or parcel of mining ground, consisting of a part of a mining location, a mining location, or two or more contiguous mining locations, or an oil, gas, or other well or claim, possessed and held under one ownership, or mined under one management and worked through a common shaft, tunnel, incline, pit, well, or other opening, or over one tram; and all valuable mineral deposits, including coal, oil, gas, or other fluid, and all lodes, veins, or rock in place containing minerals; and all shafts, tunnels, stopes, ways, and other openings, roads, appliances, machinery, timbering, and structure below the surface of the ground; and all structures, buildings, mills, and machines on the surface of the ground and affixed to the ground and used in the working, mining, and development; and all ditches, water rights, pipelines, roads, trams, flumes, and other appurtenances;

“mineral” includes coal, oil, gas, and inorganic substances subject to location, appropriation, acquisition, or enjoyment under the laws of the United States or the state.

When the phrase “different classes or kinds of property subject to lien” is used, it refers to mines as defined in this section as one class; mills and machines as another class; and the dump or mass as a third class.

History.

(§ 26-2-1 ACLA 1949)